Hawaii statutes.
§145-3 Records. Every produce dealer
shall keep a record of each lot, shipment, or consignment of farm produce
received or taken by the produce dealer, which shall be in such form and in
such detail as may be prescribed by the department of agriculture. [L 1951, c
74, pt of §1; RL 1955, §23-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2;
HRS §145-3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next